District of Columbia statutes.
16-3702

Form of complaint.

A complaint in replevin shall be in the following or equivalent form:

“The plaintiff sues the defendant for (wrongly taking and detaining) (unjustly detaining) the plaintiff’s goods and chattels, to wit: (describe them) of the value of ____ dollars. And the plaintiff claims that the same be taken from the defendant and delivered to him; or, if they are eloigned, that he may have judgment of their value and all mesne profits and damages, which he estimates at ____ dollars, besides costs.”

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 604, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-3702.
1973 Ed., § 16-3702.